Utah statutes.
31A-22-716.   Required provision for notice of termination.

(1)  Every policy for group or blanket accident and health coverage issued or renewed after July 1, 1990, shall include a provision that obligates the policyholder to give 30 days prior written notice of termination to each employee or group member and to notify each employee or group member of the employee's or group member's rights to continue coverage upon termination.

(2)  An insurer's monthly notice to the policyholder of premium payments due shall include a statement of the policyholder's obligations as set forth in Subsection (1).  Insurers shall provide a sample notice to the policyholder at least once a year.

(3)  For the purpose of compliance with federal law and the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, all health benefit plans, health insurers, and student health plans shall provide a certificate of creditable coverage to each covered person upon the person's termination from the plan as soon as reasonably possible.

